Vermont, session 2025-2026, H935.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Ready Response Grant Program * * *
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 52 is added to read:
§ 52. READY RESPONSE GRANT PROGRAM
(a) As used in this section, “ready response” means the provision of short-
term food and bottled water resources, including logistical support and
transportation, to individuals in Vermont who do not have adequate access to
food and water at agreed upon times when the Division of Emergency
Management seeks resource assistance from a grantee or responds to an all-
hazards event or state of emergency.
(b) There is created the Ready Response Grant Program to be managed and
administered by the Division of Emergency Management. The Division shall
award an annual grant to an eligible food bank to source, store, and distribute
shelf-stable, ready-to-eat foods and bottled water at times and in types and
quantities per a written memorandum of agreement with the Division.
(c) The grant shall be in an amount sufficient to compensate the grantee for
all costs incurred to procure and stage food and water in agreed upon quantities
and locations, the costs of cycling the food and water at agreed-upon intervals,
the value of distribution center storage capacity, the value of operational
capacity to stage materials in anticipation of need, and the costs of distribution
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 2 of 29
2026
whenever the Division seeks resource assistance from the grantee or responds
to an all-hazards event or state of emergency. As used in this subsection, the
“value of operational capacity” includes leased storage space, delivery
vehicles, drivers, warehouse selectors, and other operational costs.
(d) Food and water supplies subject to a grant and under the grantee’s
control shall be rotated and replenished according to established industry
guidelines and best practices. Rotated food and water shall be redistributed in
an equitable manner by the grantee through Vermont’s charitable food system
to Vermont nonprofit organizations qualifying under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) that
provide food to individuals in Vermont.
(e) To the extent that the Division requests services from the grantee that
are not covered by the Grant Program, a separate agreement shall be reached
between the Division and the grantee.
* * * Technical Rescue Grant Program * * *
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. § 53 is added to read:
§ 53. TECHNICAL RESCUE GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Creation of Program. There is created the Technical Rescue Grant
Program to assist Vermont fire departments, emergency medical services
agencies, and technical rescue agencies with the improvement of operational
readiness and investment in specialized equipment, personal protective gear,
and training. The Program shall be administered by the Urban Search and
Rescue (USAR) Team program manager.
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 3 of 29
2026
(b) Duties of USAR Team program manager. The USAR Team program
manager, in addition to other duties described elsewhere in law, shall review
grant applications, award grants, and otherwise administer the Program.
(c) Eligibility. Fire departments, emergency medical services agencies, and
technical rescue agencies operating within Vermont shall be eligible for
Program grants. Grant applicants shall demonstrate their use, planned use, or
need for technical rescue operations within their service area. All grant
applicants shall submit their application on a form adopted by the USAR Team
program manager. The USAR Team program manager shall prioritize grant
awards for applicants that:
(1) maintain a memorandum of understanding with the Division of
Emergency Management for swiftwater rescue; or
(2) function as regional technical rescue teams providing services in
multiple jurisdictions.
(d) Grant award limitations. The maximum award to any applicant in a
given fiscal year shall be not more than $5,000.00. The Program shall not
award more than $25,000.00 in total grants in a given fiscal year.
(e) Application review and scoring. The USAR Team program manager
shall adopt procedures governing application submission, forms, review,
scoring, and recommendation of awards. The procedures for application
scoring shall include alignment with the Program priorities in subsection (a) of
this section, operational need, geographic service area, feasibility of the
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 4 of 29
2026
proposed project, cost-effectiveness, and sustainability of the applicant’s
services.
(f) Grant recipient reporting; report. Each grant recipient shall submit to
the USAR Team program manager a final expenditure report, proof of
purchase or training completion, and a narrative description of how the grant
improved the recipient’s technical rescue capacity. Annually on or before
November 15, the USAR Team program manager shall submit a written report
to the House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and
the Senate Committee on Government Operations summarizing grant awards,
outcomes, and Program recommendations.
(g) Rulemaking. The USAR Team program manager may adopt rules
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 as needed to implement this section.
Sec. 2a. 20 V.S.A. § 50 is amended to read:
§ 50. URBAN SEARCH AND RESCUE TEAM
* * *
(b) The USAR Team program manager shall perform all the following
duties:
* * *
(5) negotiate and enter into agreements with municipalities, municipal
agencies that maintain swiftwater rescue teams, State-recognized swiftwater
rescue teams, or other technical rescue teams to provide expert assistance and
services to the USAR Team when necessary; and
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 5 of 29
2026
(6) coordinate USAR Team participation in search and rescue operations
under chapter 112 of this title; and
(7) administer the Technical Rescue Grant Program pursuant to section
53 of this title.
* * *
* * * Disability Inclusion in Emergency Planning * * *
Sec. 3. 20 V.S.A. § 2 is amended to read:
§ 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(13) “Whole community” means the collective of residents; emergency
management practitioners; organizational and community leaders; and local,
State, and federal government officials.
Sec. 4. 20 V.S.A. § 6 is amended to read:
§ 6. LOCAL AND REGIONAL ORGANIZATION FOR EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT
* * *
(c)(1) Each local organization shall develop and maintain an all-hazards
emergency management plan in accordance with the State Emergency
Management Plan and guidance set forth by the Division of Emergency
Management.
* * *
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 6 of 29
2026
(3) The Division shall advise municipalities that when a shelter is sited
under a local emergency plan, the municipality should work with the Agency
of Human Services, the American Red Cross, and community-based
emergency or charitable food providers whole community, to assess the facility
and the facility’s potential operations, including the characteristics of the
surrounding area during an all-hazards event, multiple routes of travel and
possible hazards that could prevent access to the shelter, and the need for
immediate and sustained access to food and water for individuals using the
shelter.
(4) The Division, in coordination with the Agency of Human Services
whole community, shall advise municipalities, upon completion of a local
emergency management plan, on how to conduct training and exercises
pertaining to sheltering.
* * *
Sec. 5. 20 V.S.A. § 32 is amended to read:
§ 32. LOCAL EMERGENCY PLANNING COMMITTEES; CREATION;
DUTIES
* * *
(b) All local emergency planning committees shall include representatives
from the following: fire departments; local and regional emergency medical
services; local, county, and State law enforcement; other entities providing first
responders or emergency management personnel; organizations serving
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 7 of 29
2026
vulnerable populations; media; transportation; regional planning commissions;
hospitals; industry; the Vermont National Guard; the Department of Health’s
district office; and an animal rescue organization, and may include any other
interested public or private individual or organization. Where the local
emergency planning committee represents more than one region of the State,
the Commission shall appoint representatives that are geographically diverse.
(c) A local emergency planning committee shall perform all the following
duties:
(1) Carry out all the requirements of a committee pursuant to EPCRA,
including preparing a local emergency planning committee plan. The plan
shall be coordinated with the State emergency management plan Emergency
Management Plan and may be expanded to address all-hazards identified in the
State emergency management plan Emergency Management Plan. A local
emergency planning committee shall coordinate with disability-led
organizations throughout all phases of emergency management planning. At a
minimum, the local emergency planning committee plan shall include the
following:
* * *
Sec. 6. [Deleted.]
* * * Town Forest Fire Wardens * * *
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 2603 is amended to read:
§ 2603. POWERS AND DUTIES: COMMISSIONER
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 8 of 29
2026
* * *
(d) The Commissioner or designee shall be the State fire warden Forest
Fire Warden and may act as, and in place of, the town forest fire warden of any
municipality, unorganized town, or gore as provided under subchapter 4 of this
chapter. The Commissioner or designee, as State Forest Fire Warden, shall
have the authority to:
(1) exercise the authority and duties of a town forest fire warden as set
forth in subchapter 4 of this chapter;
(2) appoint special forest fire wardens and delegate the authority of the
State Forest Fire Warden to the special forest fire wardens;
(3) take command and control of a forest fire in any municipality or
unorganized town or gore in the State when, in the State Forest Fire Warden’s
determination, it is necessary to do so, or when resources are needed in
addition to local resources, and act as incident commander over all other fire
officials;
(4) delegate the authority to act as incident commander of a forest fire to
another person or entity;
(5) serve on the Northeastern Forest Fire Protection Commission or
designate an appropriate Department representative to serve in the
Commissioner’s place, pursuant to section 2503 of this title, and exercise all
related authority;
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 9 of 29
2026
(6) enter into mutual aid compact agreements as set forth in section
2462 of this title; and
(7) issue a ban on kindling fires on lands owned by the Agency of
Natural Resources when necessary.
* * *
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. chapter 83, subchapter 4 is amended to read:
Subchapter 4. Forest Fires and Fire Prevention
§ 2641. TOWN FOREST FIRE WARDENS; APPOINTMENT AND
REMOVAL
(a) Upon approval by the selectboard and acceptance by the appointee, the
Commissioner shall appoint a town forest fire warden for a term of five years
or until a successor is appointed. A town forest fire warden may be reappointed
for successive five-year terms by the Commissioner or until a successor is
approved by the selectboard and appointed by the Commissioner. The warden
may be removed for cause at any time by the Commissioner with the approval
of the selectboard. A warden shall comply with training requirements
established by the Commissioner. The chief of the fire department, fire
district, or private fire department with the jurisdictional responsibility to
respond to a municipality, unorganized town, or gore is designated as the town
forest fire warden and shall have the authority to exercise all the powers and
duties of a town forest fire warden. For any municipality, unorganized town,
or gore that is covered by two or more fire districts or has two or more fire
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 10 of 29
2026
departments, the municipality, unorganized town, or gore shall designate one
fire chief as town forest fire warden and shall notify the Commissioner of the
designation.
(b) The Commissioner may appoint a forest fire warden for an unorganized
town or gore, who shall serve for a term of five years or until a successor is
appointed. An appointed forest fire warden for an unorganized town or gore
may be reappointed for successive five-year terms by the Commissioner until
the Commissioner appoints and the unorganized town or gore approves a
successor. The warden may be removed for cause at any time by the
Commissioner with the approval of the unorganized town or gore. The forest
fire warden of an unorganized town or gore shall have the same powers and
duties as town forest fire wardens and shall be subject to the requirements of
this subchapter. The chief of the fire department, fire district, or private fire
department with the jurisdictional responsibility to respond to a municipality,
unorganized town, or gore, as town forest fire warden, may designate deputy
town forest fire wardens. The town forest fire warden shall provide a list of all
designated deputy forest fire wardens to the Commissioner. Deputy forest fire
wardens shall only have the authority to issue permits to kindle a fire as set
forth in sections 2644 and 2645 of this subchapter.
(c) When there are woodlands within the limits of a city, the chief of the
fire department of such city shall act as the city forest fire warden with all the
powers and duties of town forest fire wardens. When a municipality,
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 11 of 29
2026
unorganized town, or gore does not have a fire department or is not covered by
a fire district, the municipality, unorganized town, or gore may contract with a
neighboring fire department or fire district to designate the chief of the fire
department or fire district to serve as the town forest fire warden for the
municipality, unorganized town, or gore. When a private fire department
provides fire suppression and control services to a municipality, unorganized
town, or gore, the chief of the private fire department may serve as the town
forest fire warden when approved by the municipality, unorganized town, or
gore.
(d) When the Commissioner deems it difficult in any municipality for one
warden to take charge of protecting the entire municipality from forest fires, he
or she may appoint one or more deputy forest fire wardens. Such wardens
under the direction of the fire warden shall have the same powers, duties, and
pay and make the same reports through the fire warden to the Commissioner as
forest fire wardens. [Repealed.]
(e) The Commissioner may appoint designate special forest fire wardens
who shall hold office during at the pleasure of the Commissioner. Such The
fire wardens shall be employees of the Department of Forests, Parks and
Recreation with forest fire suppression and control training, and shall have the
same powers and duties throughout the State as town forest fire wardens,
except that all expenses and charges incurred on account of their official acts
shall be paid from the appropriations for the Department.
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 12 of 29
2026
§ 2642. SALARY AND COMPENSATION OF TOWN FOREST FIRE
WARDENS
(a) The salary of a town forest fire warden and any deputy town forest fire
warden shall be determined by the selectboard members for time spent in the
performance of the duties of his or her the warden’s office, which shall be paid
by the town. In addition thereto, he or she shall receive from the
Commissioner $30.00 annually for fulfilling the requirements of section 2645
of this title and keeping the required State records. He or she shall also receive
from the Commissioner $30.00 per diem for attendance at each training
required by the Commissioner. He or she shall also receive annually an amount
of $10.00 for each fire report that is submitted by the forest fire warden under
section 2644 of this title.
* * *
§ 2643. TOWN’S LIABILITY FOR SUPPRESSION OF FOREST FIRES;
STATE AID
(a) A municipality in which a forest fire occurs shall pay the cost to
suppress a forest fire that occurs on land that is not owned by the Agency of
Natural Resources, including the costs of personnel and equipment. The
Commissioner may, according to the Department fire suppression
reimbursement policy when funds have been appropriated or are otherwise
available, reimburse a municipality for all or a portion of the costs of
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 13 of 29
2026
suppressing a forest fire on land that is not owned by the Agency of Natural
Resources.
(b) For the purpose of suppressing forest fires on lands owned by the
Agency of Natural Resources, the State shall may reimburse a town
municipality or unorganized town or gore for some or all its forest fire
suppression costs at a rate determined by the Commissioner according to the
Department fire suppression reimbursement policy. If the total acreage of a
forest fire is determined to be partially on land owned by the Agency of
Natural Resources and partially on land owned by another party, the
Commissioner shall, at a minimum, reimburse the town at a rate determined by
the Commissioner according to the Department fire suppression
reimbursement policy for costs incurred by the municipality on land owned by
the Agency of Natural Resources if, at a minimum, the requirements in
subsection (c) of this section are satisfied. The Commissioner may establish
additional requirements and guidance regarding reimbursement.
(c) For any forest fire on lands owned by the Agency of Natural Resources
to be considered eligible for reimbursement from the State, a town forest fire
warden shall have reported the forest fire to the Commissioner within 14 days
of extinguishment of the fire as required under section 2644 of this title. For
reimbursement of fire suppression costs for forest fires on land owned by the
Agency of Natural Resources, the town forest fire warden and the
Commissioner or designee shall approve the costs before submission to the
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 14 of 29
2026
municipality for payment. The town forest fire warden may submit to the State
on an annual basis a request for reimbursement of fire suppression costs on
lands owned by the Agency of Natural Resources. The State shall reimburse a
town for all applicable forest fire suppression costs when the reimbursement
request is presented in a form approved by the Commissioner to the
Commissioner by December 31 of each year. a municipality, unorganized
town, or gore shall, at a minimum, satisfy the following requirements:
(1) The town forest fire warden of a municipality, unorganized town, or
gore shall request assistance within one hour of discovery after the forest fire
from the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation Wildland Fire Team, for
the suppression of the forest fire on land owned by the Agency of Natural
Resources.
(2) The town forest fire warden shall submit a report of the forest fire to
the Commissioner within 24 hours after extinguishment of the fire as required
under section 2644 of this title.
(3) The municipality, unorganized town, or gore shall submit detailed
documentation of the costs of suppression of the forest fire to the
Commissioner within 60 days after extinguishment of the forest fire.
(4) The Commissioner shall review and approve the request for
reimbursement.
(d) For requests for reimbursement approved by the Commissioner for
forest fire suppression costs of a municipality, unorganized town, or gore on
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 15 of 29
2026
land owned by the Agency of Natural Resources, payment of the costs shall be
made by the Commissioner of Finance and Management to the municipality,
unorganized town, or gore. The funds for the payment are to be taken from the
appropriation for forest fire suppression.
§ 2644. DUTIES AND POWERS OF FIRE WARDEN
(a) When a forest fire or fire threatening a forest forestland is discovered in
his or her town the warden’s jurisdiction of responsibility, the town forest fire
warden shall enter upon any premises and take measures for its prompt control,
suppression, and extinguishment. The town forest fire warden may call upon
any person for assistance. The town forest fire warden may choose to share or
delegate command authority to a chief engineer of a responding fire
department or, in the chief’s absence, the highest ranking assistant firefighter
present during the fire. Within 24 hours after discovery of the forest fire on
lands not owned by the Agency of Natural Resources, the town forest fire
warden shall notify the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation that the
fire was discovered.
(b) A town forest fire warden shall keep prepare a report for all forest fires
in the warden’s jurisdiction that includes, at a minimum, the following
information: a record of his or her the warden’s acts, the number of forest fires
and causes of the forest fires, the areas burned over, and the character and
amount of damages done in the warden’s jurisdiction. Within two weeks 48
hours after the extinguishment of a fire, the town forest fire warden shall file a
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 16 of 29
2026
report of the fire to the Commissioner, but the making of a report under this
subsection shall not be a charge against the town.
* * *
(d) Within 12 hours after granting permission to kindle a fire pursuant to
section 2645 of this subchapter, the town forest fire warden or deputy forest
fire warden shall issue a written “Permit to Kindle” stating when and where the
fire may be kindled, including any conditions deemed appropriate by the town
forest fire warden.
§ 2645. OPEN BURNING; PERMITS
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person shall not kindle or
authorize another person to kindle a fire in the open air for the purpose of
burning natural wood, brush, weeds, or grass without first obtaining
permission a permit to kindle a fire from the town forest fire warden or deputy
forest fire warden stating when and where such the fire may be kindled and
imposing any conditions deemed necessary by the town forest fire warden or
deputy forest fire warden. Special forest fire wardens designated by the
Commissioner shall issue permits for Category 3 fires on land owned by the
Agency of Natural Resources. Wood, brush, weeds, or grass shall not be
burned if they have been altered in any way by surface applications or injection
of paints, stains, preservatives, oils, glues, or pesticides. Whenever such
permission is granted, the fire warden, within 12 hours, shall issue a written
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 17 of 29
2026
“Permit to Kindle” for record purposes stating when and where such fire may
be kindled.
(b) With the written approval of the Secretary, during During periods of
increased fire hazard, or when the Department of Environmental Conservation
has issued an Air Quality Alert due to forecasted ambient air quality, the
Commissioner may:
(1) notify Notify town forest fire wardens that for a specified period no
burning permits to kindle a fire shall be issued. The forest fire wardens shall
issue no permits during the specified period.
(2) Notify town forest fire wardens that for a specified period of time
permits for Category 2 or 3 fires shall be prohibited or restricted as set forth by
the Commissioner.
(3) Notify town forest fire wardens that for a specified period of time,
Category 1 fires shall be prohibited or restricted as set forth by the
Commissioner.
(c) The provisions of this section will not apply to A permit to kindle a fire
is not required for the following categories or conditions when the
requirements set forth below are satisfied:
(1) the kindling of a fire in a location where there is snow surrounding
the open burning site;
(2) fires built in stone arches, outdoor fireplaces, or existing fire rings at
State recreational areas or fires built in stone arches, outdoor fireplaces, or fire
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 18 of 29
2026
rings on private property that are not located within woodland, timberland, or a
field containing dry grass or other flammable plant material contiguous to
woodland; Category 1 fires; or
(3) the kindling of a fire in a location that is 200 feet or more from any
woodland, timberland, or field containing dry grass or other flammable plant
material contiguous to woodland; or
(4) areas within cities maintaining a fire department. the kindling of a
fire that complies with all requirements established by rule adopted by the
Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation when a person is primitive
camping on lands owned by the Agency of Natural Resources.
(d)(1) The Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation may issue a ban
on kindling fires on lands owned by the Agency of Natural Resources when
necessary.
(e) As used in this section, “natural wood”:
(1) “Category 1” includes campfires that meet the following
requirements:
(A) fires 36 inches in diameter or less that are built in stone arches,
outdoor fireplaces, or existing fire rings at State recreational areas, other public
recreational areas, or on private property; or
(B) fires 36 inches in diameter or less built in a location that is 200
feet or more from any forestland, or field containing dry grass or other
flammable plant materials contiguous to forestland.
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 19 of 29
2026
(2) “Category 2” includes natural wood fires that meet the following
requirements:
(A) fires in piles larger than 36 inches in diameter; or
(B) fires 36 inches in diameter or less, not built in stone arches,
outdoor fireplaces, or existing fires rings at State recreational areas, other
public recreational areas, or on private property.
(3) “Category 3 broadcast burn” includes fires that meet the following
requirements:
(A) Fires applied to existing vegetation in a predetermined land area,
in a manner to meet specific or prescribed objectives, including fuels
management, slash abatement, firefighter training, agricultural field burning,
forest management, wildlife habitat management, or introduced species
management.
(B) All Category 3 fires must have a plan that includes location,
objectives, and contingency for escaped fire.
(4) “Forestland” means woodlands, timberland, brushland, forest, and
woodlots.
(5) “Natural wood” means:
* * *
(2)(6) “Natural wood” does not mean other wood products such as
sawdust, plywood, particle board, or press board. “Natural wood” does not
mean wood, brush, weeds, or grass if they have been altered in any way by
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 20 of 29
2026
surface applications or injections of paints, stains, preservatives, oils, glues, or
pesticides.
* * *
§ 2646. PROCLAMATION BY GOVERNOR PROHIBITING KINDLING
OF FIRES: CLOSING OF WOODLANDS FORESTLANDS
(a) Whenever it appears to the Governor that there is excessive danger of
forest fires, he or she the Governor may prohibit by proclamation the kindling
of a fire in or adjoining forestland or close any or all sections of woodland
forestland, or brushland, in any town for such time as the Governor may
designate, to all persons except the owner and his or her household, his or her
tenants, servants, or agents and persons in the public employment engaged in
abating such fire-hazardous condition.
(b) Proclamations shall be published in such newspapers of the State and
posted in such places and in such manner as the Governor may order in
writing. A copy of such publication the proclamation and order, attested by the
Secretary of Civil and Military Affairs, shall be filed with the Secretary of
State and a like copy shall be furnished to the Commissioner who shall attend
to the publication and posting thereof of the proclamation. The expenses of
such publication and posting shall be paid by the Department. Notice of
removal of restrictions imposed by proclamation shall be in the same manner.
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 21 of 29
2026
§ 2647. FIRES IN WOODS FORESTLAND OF ANOTHER; PERMISSION
No one shall build a fire in the woodlands forestland of another without the
permission of the owner, lessee, holder of right-of-way, or his or her
authorized agent between April 1 and November 1. A person who builds a fire
in or adjoining any woods shall totally extinguish such fire before leaving it.
§ 2648. SLASH REMOVAL
(a) A person may cut or cause to be cut forest growth only if all slash
adjoining the right-of-way of any public highway, or the boundary lines of
woodlots forestland owned by adjoining property owners, is treated as follows:
(1) All slash shall be removed for a distance of 50 feet from the right-of-
way of any public highway or from the boundary lines of woodlots forestland
owned by adjoining property owners.
* * *
(d) As used in this section, “slash” means the branches, tree tops, and other
woody debris left on the forest floor after logging.
Sec. 9. REPEAL
10 V.S.A. chapter 83, subchapter 7 (uniform fire prevention ticket) is
repealed.
Sec. 10. 20 V.S.A. § 2673 is amended to read:
§ 2673. POWERS AND DUTIES DURING HAZARDOUS CHEMICAL OR
SUBSTANCE INCIDENT, FIRES; THREAT OF FIRES OR
EXPLOSIONS; FOREST FIRES
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 22 of 29
2026
* * *
(e) The chief of a fire district is designated as the town forest fire warden
under 10 V.S.A chapter 83, subchapter 4 and shall have the authority and
duties related to forest fires pursuant to that subchapter.
Sec. 11. 20 V.S.A. § 2992 is amended to read:
§ 2992. DEFINITION
The term “private fire department” includes fire protection organizations
operated by industries, institutions, and establishments for self-protection and
also nonprofit volunteer fire associations. Nothing contained in this subchapter
shall be construed to interfere with the exclusive jurisdiction vested by law in
the State Forester and the State Forester’s subordinates or the State Forest Fire
Warden over forest fires as provided in 10 V.S.A. § 2603(d); 10 V.S.A. chapter
83, subchapters subchapter 4 and 7; or 10 V.S.A. chapter 81, nor to affect the
laws governing prevention or extinguishment of forest fires. Nothing
contained in this subchapter shall be construed to interfere with general
authorization vested by law in a chief engineer of a fire district or chief of a
volunteer fire department to give outside aid as provided in sections 2674 and
2961 of this title.
* * * Increasing Wildland Fire Response Capacity Task Force * * *
Sec. 11a. INCREASING WILDLAND FIRE RESPONSE CAPACITY
TASK FORCE; REPORT
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 23 of 29
2026
(a) Creation. There is created the Increasing Wildland Fire Response
Capacity Task Force to examine and report on increasing Vermont’s capacity
for wildland fire response.
(b) Membership. The following individuals and entities shall be invited by
Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to join the Task Force:
(1) the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation;
(2) Vermont Emergency Management;
(3) the Department of Public Safety, Division of Fire Safety;
(4) the Green Mountain National Forest;
(5) the Vermont League of Cities and Towns; and
(6) two municipal fire chiefs, with one being a career fire fighter and the
other being a volunteer fire fighter.
(c) Powers and duties. The Task Force shall examine how to best increase
Vermont’s capacity for wildland fire response, including:
(1) examining available information on wildland fire incidence and
existing response capacity, and making recommendations regarding staffing,
funding, equipment, supplies, and infrastructure, including vehicles, necessary
to increase wildland fire response capacity; and
(2) identifying any potential policy or statutory changes needed to
improve wildland fire response capacity; clarify statewide roles and
responsibilities among State, municipal, and federal entities; and recommend
any coordination and communication improvements.
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 24 of 29
2026
(d) Assistance. The Task Force shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.
(e) Report. On or before February 15, 2027, and again on or before July
2027, the Task Force shall submit a written report to House Committees on
Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry and on Government Operations and
Military Affairs and to the Senate Committees on Natural Resources and
Energy and on Government Operations with its findings to date and any
recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Commissioner of the Department of Forests, Parks and
Recreation, or designee, shall call the first meeting of the Task Force.
(2) The Commissioner of the Department of Forests, Parks and
Recreation, or designee, shall be the chair of the Task Force.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Task Force shall cease to exist on November 16, 2027.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Task Force shall be
entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted
under 32 V.S.A. § 1010. These payments shall be made from monies
appropriated to the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 25 of 29
2026
* * * Public Safety Communications * * *
Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY; PUBLIC SAFETY
COMMUNICATIONS TASK FORCE; AUTHORIZATION FOR
ONGOING EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS
(a) The General Assembly authorizes the use of monies appropriated or
held in reserve pursuant 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. B.1100, as
amended by 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. C.115 and 2023 Acts and
Resolves No. 87, Sec. 49, for the Department of Public Safety to procure and
implement a multidisciplinary computer-aided dispatch system for public
safety communications, subject to the following:
(1) $2,250,000.00 shall be available for immediate costs associated with
establishing the multidisciplinary computer-aided dispatch system and five
years of software licensing fees, provided that the Department issues requests
for proposal and signs contracts for services on or before January 1, 2027;
(2) $190,000.00 shall be immediately available for cybersecurity,
expanded use of Rapid SOS, and geographic information systems; and
(3) $4,500,000.00 shall be available incrementally over three years to:
(A) implement and expand the Land Mobile Radio network to
include a Statewide conceptual design;
(B) detail designs for one or more proof of concept projects and
initially implement pilot projects; and
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 26 of 29
2026
(C) build out or improve 10 or more Land Mobile Radio sites,
including equipment and antenna deployment at existing chosen sites.
(b) Notwithstanding any provisions of 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec.
C.114 to the contrary, the Public Safety Communications Task Force shall
continue in existence until February 15, 2027. The Task Force shall meet as
necessary to advise the Department of Public Safety on executing the Task
Force recommendations and final design plan. Notwithstanding 2023 Acts and
Resolves No. 78, Sec. C.114(d)(3), members of the Task Force shall be entitled
to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses permitted under 32
V.S.A. § 1010. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to
the Department of Public Safety.
(c) The Department of Public Safety shall submit written reports to the
House Committees on Appropriations and on Government Operations and
Military Affairs and the Senate Committees on Appropriations and
Government Operations concerning the expenditure of monies pursuant to this
section. The Department shall submit the written reports on or before May 1,
2027, January 15, 2028, and January 15, 2029, concerning the expenditures
made during each respective reporting period.
Sec. 13. [Deleted.]
* * * Programs Contingent on Availability of Agency Funds * * *
Sec. 13a. PROGRAMS CONTINGENT ON AVAILABILITY OF AGENCY
FUNDS
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 27 of 29
2026
The duty to implement Secs. 1 (Ready Response Grant Program) and 2
(Technical Rescue Grant Program) of this act is contingent upon the
availability of sufficient funds within the Department of Public Safety and the
Agency of Administration to support the programs.
* * * Appropriation * * *
Sec. 13b. [Deleted.]
* * * Emergency Rule * * *
Sec. 13c. 3 V.S.A. § 844 is amended to read:
§ 844. EMERGENCY RULES
(a) Where an agency believes that there exists an imminent peril to public
health, safety, or welfare, it may adopt an emergency rule. The rule may be
adopted without having been prefiled or filed in proposed or final proposed
form, and may be adopted after whatever notice and hearing the agency finds
to be practicable under the circumstances. The agency shall make reasonable
efforts to ensure that emergency rules are known to persons who may be
affected by them.
* * *
(g) In the alternative to the grounds specified in subsection (a) of this
section, an agency may adopt emergency amendments to existing rules using
the process set forth in this section if each of the subdivisions (1)–(5) of this
subsection applies. On a majority vote of the entire Committee, the Legislative
Committee on Administrative Rules may object to the emergency amendments
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 28 of 29
2026
on the basis that one or more of these subdivisions do not apply or under
subdivision (e)(1)(A), (B), or (C) of this section, or both.
(1) The existing rules implement a program controlled by federal statute
or rule or by a multistate entity.
(2) The controlling federal statute or rule has been amended to require a
change in the program, or the multistate entity has made a change in the
program that is to be implemented in all of the participating states.
(3) The controlling federal statute or rule or the multistate entity requires
implementation of the change within 120 days or less.
(4) The adopting authority finds each of the following in writing:
(A) The agency cannot by the date required for implementation
complete the final adoption of amended rules using the process set forth in
sections 837 through 843 837–843 of this title.
(B) Failure to amend the rules by the date required for
implementation would cause significant harm to the public health, safety, or
welfare or significant financial loss to the State.
(5) On the date the emergency rule amendments are adopted pursuant to
this subsection, the adopting authority prefiles a corresponding permanent rule
pursuant to section 837 of this title.
(h) In addition to the grounds for emergency rulemaking under subsections
(a) and (g) of this section, an agency may adopt an emergency rule under this
section if an amendment to a federal statute, rule, or policy will materially
VT LEG #390254 v.1

No. 162 Page 29 of 29
2026
conflict with or threaten the ability of the agency to implement a statutory or
regulatory program required under Vermont law. On a majority vote of the
entire Committee, the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules may
object to proposed emergency rules for adoption under this subsection on the
basis that the provisions of this subsection do not apply.
Sec. 13d. SUNSET OF AGENCY EMERGENCY RULEMAKING
AUTHORITY
3 V.S.A. § 844(h) (emergency rulemaking in response to federal action) is
repealed on July 1, 2028.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 14. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and sections 13c and 13d shall take effect upon passage.
(b) All other sections shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 17, 2026
VT LEG #390254 v.1